Washington statutes.
RCW 43.70.619

Pregnancy complications—Informational resources.

By December 31, 2021, the department shall design, prepare, and make available online, written materials to clearly inform health care providers and staff of the provisions of, and authority to act under, chapter 70.400 RCW.

[ 2021 c 235 s 5.]

NOTES:

Conflict with federal requirements—2021 c 235: See RCW 70.400.900.